Utah statutes.
48-2c-405.   When amendment to articles of organization required.

The articles of organization of a company shall be amended when:

(1)  there is a change in the name of the company;

(2)  there is a change in the character of the business of the company specified in the articles of organization;

(3)  there is a false or erroneous statement in the articles of organization;

(4)  there is a change in the period of duration of the company that is:

(a)  stated in the articles of organization; or

(b)  provided for in Section 48-2c-403;

(5)  there is a change in:

(a)  the management structure of the company from a manager-managed company to a member-managed company or from a member-managed company to a manager-managed company;

(b)  if the company is manager-managed, who is a manager of the company; or

(c)  if the company is member-managed, who is a member of the company;

(6)  in accordance with Section 48-2c-412, the company ceases to be a low-profit limited liability company; or

(7)  the members desire to make a change in any other statement in the articles of organization in order for the articles to accurately represent the agreement among the members.



Amended by Chapter 141, 2009 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

